Washington statutes.
RCW 35.10.315

Adoption of final budget and levy of property taxes.

Upon the consolidation of two or more cities, or the annexation of any city after March 1st and prior to the date of adopting the final budget and levying the property tax dollar rate in that year for the next calendar year, the legislative body of the consolidated city or the annexing city is authorized to adopt the final budget and to levy the property tax dollar rate for the consolidated cities and any city annexed.

[ 1985 c 281 s 20; 1973 1st ex.s. c 195 s 13; 1969 ex.s. c 89 s 14.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective dates—Construction—1973 1st ex.s. c 195: See notes following RCW 84.52.043.